Washington statutes.
RCW 19.154.900

Short title.

This chapter shall be known and cited as the "immigration services fraud prevention act."

[ 2011 c 244 s 8; 1989 c 117 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 244: See note following RCW 19.154.010.